klpt/data/ckb-Arab.aff
SFX T Y 1460
SFX T 0 م . # BEGIN: Simple past/progressive past - agent and patient suffixes
SFX T 0 ت .
SFX T 0 یە .
SFX T 0 یەوە .
SFX T 0 ی .
SFX T 0 مان .
SFX T 0 تان .
SFX T 0 یان .
SFX T 0 یت .
SFX T 0 ن .
SFX T 0 ین .
SFX T 0 من .
SFX T 0 میت .
SFX T 0 می .
SFX T 0 تم .
SFX T 0 تت .
SFX T 0 تین .
SFX T 0 تن .
SFX T 0 یتی .
SFX T 0 ینی .
SFX T 0 نی .
SFX T 0 مانیت .
SFX T 0 مانی .
SFX T 0 مانن .
SFX T 0 تانم .
SFX T 0 تانین .
SFX T 0 تانن .
SFX T 0 یانم .
SFX T 0 یانی .
SFX T 0 یانیت .
SFX T 0 یانین .
SFX T 0 یانن .
SFX T 0 مەوە .
SFX T 0 تەوە .
SFX T 0 ییەوە .
SFX T 0 مانەوە .
SFX T 0 تانەوە .
SFX T 0 یانەوە .
SFX T 0 منەوە .
SFX T 0 میتەوە .
SFX T 0 مییەوە .
SFX T 0 تمەوە .
SFX T 0 تتەوە .
SFX T 0 تینەوە .
SFX T 0 تنەوە .
SFX T 0 یتییەوە .
SFX T 0 ینییەوە .
SFX T 0 نییەوە .
SFX T 0 مانییەوە .
SFX T 0 ماننەوە .
SFX T 0 تانمەوە .
SFX T 0 تانینەوە .
SFX T 0 تاننەوە .
SFX T 0 یانمەوە .
SFX T 0 یانییەوە .
SFX T 0 یانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 یانینەوە .
SFX T 0 یاننەوە .
SFX T 0 یتەوە .
SFX T 0 نەوە .
SFX T 0 ینەوە .
SFX T 0 ەوە [^ایێە]
SFX T 0 وە [ەا]
SFX T 0 یەوە [ێی] # END: Simple past/progressive past - agent and patient suffixes
SFX T 0 ووە [^ایو] # BEGIN: Present perfect
SFX T 0 وە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ووەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وومە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویەتی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومەتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویتەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویتەتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووەتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووینەتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وونەتە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووم [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویت [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووین [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وون [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومیت [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومن [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویم [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانیت [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانن [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانم [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانیت [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانن [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانم [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانتی [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانین [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانن [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومیەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومنەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویمەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانیەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووماننەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانمەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانیەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانیتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتاننەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانمەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانیەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانتیەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانینەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویاننەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومیەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومیتەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومنەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویمەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانیەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وومانیتەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووماننەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانمەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانیەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتانیتەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ووتاننەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانمەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانیەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانتیەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویانینەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 وویاننەتەوە [^ایو]
SFX T 0 ومە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویەتی [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وم [ایو]
SFX T 0 وی [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویت [ایو]
SFX T 0 وین [ایو]
SFX T 0 ون [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومی [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومیت [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومن [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویم [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانی [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانیت [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانن [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانم [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانی [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانیت [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانین [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانن [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانم [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانی [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانتی [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانین [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانن [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومیەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومیتەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومنەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویمەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانیەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ومانیتەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وماننەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانمەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانیەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانیتەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتانینەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 وتاننەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانمەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانیەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانتیەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویانینەتەوە [ایو]
SFX T 0 ویاننەتەوە [ایو] # END: Present perfect
SFX T 0 بوو . # BEGIN: Past perfect
SFX T 0 بوویت .
SFX T 0 بووین .
SFX T 0 بوون .
SFX T 0 بووم .
SFX T 0 بووت .
SFX T 0 بووی .
SFX T 0 بوومان .
SFX T 0 بووتان .
SFX T 0 بوویان .
SFX T 0 بوومەوە .
SFX T 0 بووتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووییەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویەوە .
SFX T 0 بوومانەوە .
SFX T 0 بووتانەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویانەوە .
SFX T 0 بووەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووینەوە .
SFX T 0 بوونەوە .
SFX T 0 بوومی .
SFX T 0 بوومتی .
SFX T 0 بوومن .
SFX T 0 بووتم .
SFX T 0 بووتی .
SFX T 0 بووتین .
SFX T 0 بووتن .
SFX T 0 بوومانت .
SFX T 0 بوومانی .
SFX T 0 بوومانن .
SFX T 0 بووتانم .
SFX T 0 بووتانی .
SFX T 0 بووتانین .
SFX T 0 بووتانن .
SFX T 0 بوویانم .
SFX T 0 بوویانت .
SFX T 0 بوویانی .
SFX T 0 بوویانین .
SFX T 0 بوویانن . # END: Past perfect
SFX T 0 بووشیت . # BEGIN: Past perfect with ish
SFX T 0 بوویشن .
SFX T 0 بووشن .
SFX T 0 بووشم .
SFX T 0 بووشت .
SFX T 0 بووشی .
SFX T 0 بووشمان .
SFX T 0 بووشتان .
SFX T 0 بووشیان .
SFX T 0 بووشمەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشییەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشیەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشمانەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشینەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشنەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشمی .
SFX T 0 بووشمت .
SFX T 0 بووشمن .
SFX T 0 بووشتم .
SFX T 0 بووشتی .
SFX T 0 بووشتین .
SFX T 0 بووشتن .
SFX T 0 بووشمانت .
SFX T 0 بووشمانی .
SFX T 0 بووشمانن .
SFX T 0 بووشتانم .
SFX T 0 بووشتانی .
SFX T 0 بووشتانین .
SFX T 0 بووشتانن .
SFX T 0 بووشیانم .
SFX T 0 بووشیانت .
SFX T 0 بووشیانی .
SFX T 0 بووشیانین .
SFX T 0 بووشیانن . # END: Past perfect with ish
SFX T 0 بیشنەوە . 
SFX T 0 بم . # BEGIN: Past subjunctive
SFX T 0 بی . 
SFX T 0 بیت . 
SFX T 0 بێ . 
SFX T 0 بێت .  
SFX T 0 بین . 
SFX T 0 بن . 
SFX T 0 بمەوە . 
SFX T 0 بییەوە . 
SFX T 0 بیەوە . 
SFX T 0 بیتەوە .  
SFX T 0 بێت .
SFX T 0 بێم .
SFX T 0 بێیت .
SFX T 0 بێین .
SFX T 0 بێن .
SFX T 0 بێتم .
SFX T 0 بێتت .
SFX T 0 بێتی .
SFX T 0 بێتمان .
SFX T 0 بێتتان .
SFX T 0 بێتیان .
SFX T 0 بێتمەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتییەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتمانەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتانەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتیانەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتمە .
SFX T 0 بێتتە .
SFX T 0 بێتیە .
SFX T 0 بێتمانە .
SFX T 0 بێتتانە .
SFX T 0 بێتیانە .
SFX T 0 بێیەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتەوە .
SFX T 0 بێمەوە .
SFX T 0 بێیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بێینەوە .
SFX T 0 بێنەوە .
SFX T 0 بێمی .
SFX T 0 بێمتی .
SFX T 0 بێمن .
SFX T 0 بێتین .
SFX T 0 بێتن .
SFX T 0 بێمانت .
SFX T 0 بێمانی .
SFX T 0 بێمانن .
SFX T 0 بێتانم .
SFX T 0 بێتانی .
SFX T 0 بێتانین .
SFX T 0 بێتانن .
SFX T 0 بێیانم .
SFX T 0 بێیانت .
SFX T 0 بێیانی .
SFX T 0 بێیانین .
SFX T 0 بێیانن .
SFX T 0 بێتمی .
SFX T 0 بێتمتی .
SFX T 0 بێتمن .
SFX T 0 بێتتم .
SFX T 0 بێتتی .
SFX T 0 بێتتن .
SFX T 0 بێتمانت .
SFX T 0 بێتمانی .
SFX T 0 بێتمانن .
SFX T 0 بێتتانم .
SFX T 0 بێتتانی .
SFX T 0 بێتتانین .
SFX T 0 بێتتانن .
SFX T 0 بێتیانم .
SFX T 0 بێتیانت .
SFX T 0 بێتیانی .
SFX T 0 بێتیانین .
SFX T 0 بێتیانن .
SFX T 0 بێتمییەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتمتییەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتمنەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتمەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتیەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتینەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتنەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتمانتەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتمانیەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتماننەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتانییەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتانینەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتتاننەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتیانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتیانتەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتیانییەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتیانینەوە .
SFX T 0 بێتیاننەوە . # END: Past subjunctive
SFX T 0 با . # BEGIN: Past conditional
SFX T 0 بام .
SFX T 0 بای .
SFX T 0 بایت .
SFX T 0 باین .
SFX T 0 بان .
SFX T 0 بات .
SFX T 0 بامان .
SFX T 0 باتان .
SFX T 0 بایان .
SFX T 0 بامەوە .
SFX T 0 باتەوە .
SFX T 0 بایتەوە .
SFX T 0 بایەوە .
SFX T 0 بامانەوە .
SFX T 0 باتانەوە .
SFX T 0 بایانەوە .
SFX T 0 بامە .
SFX T 0 باتە .
SFX T 0 بایتە .
SFX T 0 بایە .
SFX T 0 بامانە .
SFX T 0 باتانە .
SFX T 0 بایانە .
SFX T 0 بامی .
SFX T 0 بامیت .
SFX T 0 بامن .
SFX T 0 بایتم .
SFX T 0 بایم .
SFX T 0 بایین .
SFX T 0 بامانی .
SFX T 0 بامانیت .
SFX T 0 بامانن .
SFX T 0 باتانم .
SFX T 0 باتانین .
SFX T 0 باتانن .
SFX T 0 بایانم .
SFX T 0 بایانی .
SFX T 0 بایانیت .
SFX T 0 بایانین .
SFX T 0 بایانن .
SFX T 0 بامیەوە .
SFX T 0 بامیە .
SFX T 0 بامیتە .
SFX T 0 بامیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بامنە .
SFX T 0 بامنەوە .
SFX T 0 بایتمە .
SFX T 0 بایتمەوە .
SFX T 0 بایمە .
SFX T 0 بایمەوە .
SFX T 0 بایینە .
SFX T 0 بایینەوە .
SFX T 0 باینە .
SFX T 0 باینەوە .
SFX T 0 بامانیە .
SFX T 0 بامانیەوە .
SFX T 0 بامانیتە .
SFX T 0 بامانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 باماننە .
SFX T 0 باماننەوە .
SFX T 0 باتانمە .
SFX T 0 باتانمەوە .
SFX T 0 باتانینەوە .
SFX T 0 باتانینە .
SFX T 0 باتاننە .
SFX T 0 باتاننەوە .
SFX T 0 بایانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بایانمە .
SFX T 0 بایانیە .
SFX T 0 بایانیەوە .
SFX T 0 بایانیتە .
SFX T 0 بایانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بایانینە .
SFX T 0 بایانینەوە .
SFX T 0 بایاننەوە .
SFX T 0 ایە .
SFX T 0 ایەوە .
SFX T 0 ایم .
SFX T 0 ایی .
SFX T 0 اییت .
SFX T 0 ایت .
SFX T 0 این . # END: Past conditional
SFX T 0 بێتیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیشم .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتم .
SFX T 0 بێتیشمی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتانم .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیانم .
SFX T 0 بێتمیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیتی .
SFX T 0 بێتمانیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیانیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیشمیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیتی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشمانیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیانیت .
SFX T 0 بێتیش .
SFX T 0 بێتیشت .
SFX T 0 بێتیشی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشمان .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتان .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیان .
SFX T 0 بێتتین .
SFX T 0 بێتینی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشین .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتین .
SFX T 0 بێتیشینی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتانین .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیانین .
SFX T 0 بێتنی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشن .
SFX T 0 بێتیشمن .
SFX T 0 بێتیشنی .
SFX T 0 بێتیشمانن .
SFX T 0 بێتیشیانن .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتن .
SFX T 0 بێتیشتانن .
SFX T 0 بوویشمی .
SFX T 0 بوومیت .
SFX T 0 بوویتی .
SFX T 0 بوومانیت .
SFX T 0 بوویانیت .
SFX T 0 بووشمیت .
SFX T 0 بوویشیتی .
SFX T 0 بووشمانیت .
SFX T 0 بووشیانیت .
SFX T 0 بووش .
SFX T 0 بوویشی .
SFX T 0 بووینی .
SFX T 0 بووشین .
SFX T 0 بوویشینی .
SFX T 0 بوونی .
SFX T 0 بوویشنی .
SFX T 0 بوومایە .
SFX T 0 بوویتایە .
SFX T 0 بووایە .
SFX T 0 بووینایە .
SFX T 0 بوونایە .
SFX T 0 بووتمایە .
SFX T 0 بوومیایە .
SFX T 0 بووتانمایە .
SFX T 0 بوویانمایە .
SFX T 0 بووشمایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتمایە .
SFX T 0 بوویشمیایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانمایە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانمایە .
SFX T 0 بوومیتایە .
SFX T 0 بوویتیایە .
SFX T 0 بوومانیتایە .
SFX T 0 بوویانیتایە .
SFX T 0 بووشیتایە .
SFX T 0 بووشمیتایە .
SFX T 0 بوویشیتیایە .
SFX T 0 بووشمانیتایە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانیتایە .
SFX T 0 بووتایە .
SFX T 0 بوویایە .
SFX T 0 بوومانایە .
SFX T 0 بووتانایە .
SFX T 0 بوویانایە .
SFX T 0 بووشایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتایە .
SFX T 0 بوویشیایە .
SFX T 0 بووشمانایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانایە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانایە .
SFX T 0 بووتینایە .
SFX T 0 بووینیایە .
SFX T 0 بووتانینایە .
SFX T 0 بوویانینایە .
SFX T 0 بووشینایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتینایە .
SFX T 0 بوویشینیایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانینایە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانینایە .
SFX T 0 بوومنایە .
SFX T 0 بوونیایە .
SFX T 0 بووماننایە .
SFX T 0 بوویاننایە .
SFX T 0 بووشنایە .
SFX T 0 بووشمنایە .
SFX T 0 بوویشنیایە .
SFX T 0 بووشماننایە .
SFX T 0 بووشیاننایە .
SFX T 0 بووتنایە .
SFX T 0 بووتاننایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتنایە .
SFX T 0 بووشتاننایە .
SFX T 0 بوومە .
SFX T 0 بوویتە .
SFX T 0 بووە .
SFX T 0 بووینە .
SFX T 0 بوونە .
SFX T 0 بووتمەوە .
SFX T 0 بووتمە .
SFX T 0 بوومییەوە .
SFX T 0 بوومییە .
SFX T 0 بووتانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بووتانمە .
SFX T 0 بوویانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویانمە .
SFX T 0 بووشمە .
SFX T 0 بووشتمەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشتمە .
SFX T 0 بوویشمییەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویشمییە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانمە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانمەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانمە .
SFX T 0 بوومیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بوومیتە .
SFX T 0 بوویتییەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویتییە .
SFX T 0 بوومانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بوومانیتە .
SFX T 0 بوویانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویانیتە .
SFX T 0 بووشیتە .
SFX T 0 بووشمیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشمیتە .
SFX T 0 بوویشیتییەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویشیتییە .
SFX T 0 بووشمانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشمانیتە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانیتەوە .
SFX T 0 بووشیانیتە .
SFX T 0 بووتە .
SFX T 0 بوویە .
SFX T 0 بوومانە .
SFX T 0 بووتانە .
SFX T 0 بوویانە .
SFX T 0 بووشە .
SFX T 0 بووشتە .
SFX T 0 بوویشییەوە .
SFX T 0 بوویشییە .
SFX T 0 بووشمانە .
SFX T 0 بووشتانە .
